Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 30.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-130
Becoming member.

(RULLCA 401) (a) If a limited liability
company is to have only one member upon formation, the person becomes a member
as agreed by that person and the organizer of the company. That person and
the organizer may be, but need not be, different persons. If different, the
organizer acts on behalf of the initial member.

(b) If a limited liability
company is to have more than one member upon formation, those persons become
members as agreed by the persons before the formation of the company. The
organizer acts on behalf of the persons in forming the company and may be,
but need not be, one of the persons.

(c) After formation of a limited liability company,
a person becomes a member:

(1) as provided in the operating agreement;

(2) as the result of
a transaction effective under sections 21-170 to 21-184;

(3) with the consent
of all the members; or

(4)
if, within ninety consecutive days after the company ceases to have any members:

(A) the last person to
have been a member, or the legal representative of that person, designates
a person to become a member; and

(B) the designated person consents to become a member.

(d) A person may become
a member without acquiring a transferable interest and without making or being
obligated to make a contribution to the limited liability company.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 30.